Utah statutes.
53A-20-100.5.   Prohibition of school impact fees.

(1)  As used in this section, "school impact fee" means a charge on new development in order to generate revenue for funding or recouping the costs of capital improvements for schools or school facility expansions necessitated by and attributable to the new development.

(2)  Beginning March 21, 1995, there is a moratorium prohibiting a county, city, town, local school board, or any other political subdivision from imposing or collecting a school impact fee unless hereafter authorized by the Legislature by statute.

(3)  Collection of any fees authorized before March 21, 1995, by any ordinance, resolution or rule of any county, city, town, local school board, or other political subdivision shall terminate on May 1, 1996, unless hereafter authorized by the Legislature by statute.

